Hawaii statutes.
§446-3 Persons not affected. The
following persons are not debt adjusters for the purposes of this chapter:

(1) An attorney licensed to practice law in this
State, including the Legal Aid Society of Hawaii;

(2) A person who is a regular full-time employee of a
debtor and who acts as an adjuster of the person's employer's debt;

(3) A person acting pursuant to any order or judgment
of court or pursuant to authority conferred by any law of this State or of the
United States;

(4) A nonprofit or charitable corporation or
association who acts as an adjuster of a debtor's debts, even though the
nonprofit corporation or association may charge and collect nominal sums as
reimbursement for expenses in connection with such services. [L 1967, c 3, §4;
HRS §446-3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next